Utah statutes.
11-13-207.   Additional requirements for agreement not establishing interlocal entity.

If an agreement under Section 11-13-202 does not establish an interlocal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement shall, in addition to the items specified in Section 11-13-206, provide for:

(1) the joint or cooperative undertaking to be administered by:

(a)  an administrator; or

(b)  a joint board with representation from the public agencies that are parties to the agreement; and

(2) the manner of acquiring, holding, and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

